Hawaii statutes.
§87A-36 State and county contributions;
employees hired after June 30, 2001, and retired. (a) This section shall
apply to state and county contributions to the fund for employees hired after
June 30, 2001, and who retired, except that this section shall not apply to the
following employees, for whom state and county contributions shall be made as
provided by section 87A-35:

(1) An employee hired after June 30, 1996, and prior
to July 1, 2001, who transfers employment after June 30, 2001, and who cumulatively
accrues at least ten years of credited service; and

(2) An employee hired after June 30, 1996, and prior
to July 1, 2001, who has at least ten years of credited service prior to a
break in service.

For purposes of this section:

"Break in service" means to leave
state or county employment for more than ninety calendar days before returning
to state or county employment.

"Transfer" means to leave state or
county employment and return to state or county employment within ninety
calendar days.

(b) For purposes of this section, if an
employee leaves state or county employment and returns to state or county
employment after July 1, 2001, upon retirement, the employee's years of service
shall be computed in the same manner as set forth in chapter 88.

(c) The State, through the department of
budget and finance, and the counties, through their respective departments of
finance, shall pay to the fund:

(1) For retired employees based on the self plan with
ten or more years but fewer than fifteen years of service, a monthly
contribution equal to one-half of the base medicare or non-medicare monthly
contribution set forth under section 87A-33(b);

(2) For retired employees based on the self plan with
at least fifteen but fewer than twenty-five years of service, a monthly
contribution equal to seventy-five per cent of the base medicare or
non-medicare monthly contribution set forth under section 87A-33(b);

(3) For retired employees based on the self plan with
twenty-five or more years of service, a monthly contribution equal to
one-hundred per cent of the base medicare or non-medicare monthly contribution
set forth under section 87A-33(b); and

(4) One-half of the monthly contributions for the
employee-beneficiary or employee-beneficiary with dependent-beneficiaries upon
the death of the employee, as defined in paragraph (1)(E) of the definition of
"employee" in section 87A-1.

If both husband and wife are
employee-beneficiaries, the total contribution by the State or county shall not
exceed the monthly contribution for two supplemental medicare self or
non-medicare self plans, as appropriate. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1; am L 2004, c
184, §2]

Note

L 2004, c 184, §3 provides:

"SECTION 3. The board of trustees of the employer-union
health benefits trust fund shall establish a process by which public employees
affected by this Act shall be notified of the retirement health benefits
options provided under this Act."

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next